Washington statutes.
RCW 43.12.065

Rules pertaining to public use of state lands—Enforcement—Penalty.

(1) For the promotion of the public safety and the protection of public property, the department of natural resources may, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, issue, promulgate, adopt, and enforce rules pertaining to use by the public of state-owned lands and property which are administered by the department.

(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a violation of any rule adopted under this section is a misdemeanor.

(b) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the department may specify by rule, when not inconsistent with applicable statutes, that violation of such a rule is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. However, any violation of a rule relating to traffic including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses is a traffic infraction.

(c) Violation of such a rule equivalent to those provisions of Title 46 RCW set forth in RCW 46.63.020 remains a misdemeanor.

(3) The commissioner of public lands and those employees as the commissioner may designate shall be vested with police powers when enforcing:

(a) The rules of the department adopted under this section;

(b) The civil infractions created under RCW 79A.80.080; or

(c) The general criminal statutes or ordinances of the state or its political subdivisions where enforcement is necessary for the protection of state-owned lands and property.

(4) The commissioner of public lands may, under the provisions of RCW 7.84.140, enter into an agreement allowing employees of the state parks and recreation commission and the department of fish and wildlife to enforce certain civil infractions created under this title.

[ 2011 c 320 s 16; 2003 c 53 s 229; 1987 c 380 s 14; 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 38; 1969 ex.s. c 160 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.30.310.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 320: See note following RCW 79A.80.005.

Findings—Intent—2011 c 320: See RCW 79A.80.005.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Effective date—1987 c 380: See RCW 7.84.900.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 136: See notes following RCW 46.63.010.